Utah statutes.
23-23-7.   Permits -- Acreage and lands that may be included -- Posting of
boundaries.
(1)  The division shall provide cooperative wildlife management unit
authorizations for hunting small game or waterfowl to the cooperative wildlife
management unit, free of charge.
(2)  At least 50% of the cooperative wildlife management unit authorizations
for hunting small game or waterfowl provided to a cooperative wildlife
management unit shall be offered for sale to the general public at the times
and places designated on the application for a certificate of registration.
(3) (a)  Cooperative wildlife management units organized for hunting small
game or waterfowl shall consist of private land.
(b)  At least 75% of the acreage within the boundaries of each cooperative
wildlife management unit organized for the hunting of small game or waterfowl
shall be open to hunting by holders of valid authorizations.
(4) (a)  The division may issue cooperative wildlife management unit permits
for hunting cougar, turkey, or big game to permittees:
(i)  qualifying through a public drawing; or
(ii)  named by the cooperative wildlife management unit operator.
(b)  The Wildlife Board may specify by rule those persons who are eligible to
draw a cooperative wildlife management unit permit in a public drawing.
(5) (a)  Cooperative wildlife management units organized for hunting cougar,
turkey, or big game shall consist of private land to the extent practicable.
Public land may be included within a cooperative wildlife management unit if:
(i)  the public land is completely surrounded by private land or is otherwise
inaccessible to the general public;
(ii)  including public land is necessary to establish a readily identifiable
boundary; or
(iii)  including public land is necessary to achieve cougar, turkey, or big
game management objectives.
(b)  If any public land is included within a cooperative wildlife management
unit:
(i)  the landowner association shall meet applicable federal or state land use
requirements on the public land; and
(ii)  the Wildlife Board shall increase the number of permits or hunting
opportunities made available to the general public to reflect the proportion
of public lands to private lands within the cooperative wildlife management
unit.
(6)  Each landowner association shall:
(a)  clearly post all boundaries of the unit by displaying signs containing
information prescribed by rule of the Wildlife Board at the locations
specified in Subsection 23-20-14(1)(d); and
(b)  provide a written copy of its guidelines to each holder of an
authorization or permit.
